Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Truss Construction Emblems

§ 45-11-301.
Owners of certain buildings required to attach truss construction emblem to building; emblem requirements; exemptions; contractor performing work on certain buildings to be responsible for proper attachment of emblem.

The owner of any building located in the State of Mississippi with a floor or ceiling constructed with truss construction must attach to the building an emblem that identifies the building as having truss construction. The emblem shall:

Be permanently affixed to the left of the main entrance door at a height between four (4) feet and six (6) feet above the ground;

Be of a bright and reflective color or made of a reflective material;

Be in the shape of an isosceles triangle measuring six (6) inches horizontally and three (3) inches vertically;

Have conspicuously printed on it the following letters, as appropriate, based on the type of truss construction used in the building being identified by the emblem:

“F” to signify a floor with truss construction;

“R” to signify a roof with truss construction; or

“F/R” to signify both a floor and roof with truss construction.

This section shall not apply to any building with truss construction that is a detached one- or two-family residential structure.

This section shall not apply to any building constructed before July 1, 2010, unless such building undergoes expansion or remodeling on or after that date.

For purposes of this section, the term “truss” shall mean structural members, such as boards, timbers, beams or steel bars, joined together in a rigid framework.

The contractor who performs the construction, expansion or remodeling of any building on or after July 1, 2010, shall be responsible for the proper attachment of the truss construction emblem to the building.

The State Fire Marshal may promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.